Hawaii statutes.
§286-239.5 Reactivation of expired
commercial driver's license; fees; road test waived. (a) Unless revoked
or suspended, and except as provided in subsection (b), any commercial driver's
license that has expired under section 286-239 or rules adopted pursuant to
section 286-246 may be reactivated by the licensee in accordance with the
requirements and procedures set forth for the renewal of commercial drivers'
licenses under section 286-239(g). No person seeking reactivation of an
expired commercial driver's license under this subsection shall be required to
undergo reexamination of the person's driving skills under section 286-236.
The examiner of drivers shall require the holder of an expired commercial
driver's license to pay a reactivation fee of $5 for each thirty-day period, or
fraction thereof, that has elapsed after a ninety-day grace period.

(b) Any commercial driver's license not
reactivated under subsection (a) within one year of the indicated date of
expiration shall be invalid. The examiner of drivers shall examine an
applicant whose commercial driver's license has been declared invalid under
this subsection in accordance with the licensing procedures established under
sections 286-236 and 286-239. [L 1998, c 93, §1; am L 2014, c 72, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next